Illinois, session 104th, HB1748.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The General Assembly Operations Act is amended 5by adding Section 19 as follows: 6    (25 ILCS 10/19 new)7    Sec. 19. Public review of legislation. All bills 8introduced in the General Assembly must remain in the chamber 9of origin for at least 5 calendar days before they can be voted 10upon on third reading and passed out of the chamber. Upon 11passage to the other chamber of the General Assembly, the 5 12calendar day requirement is in effect and begins with the day 13of the bill's arrival in the new chamber. If a bill is amended 14in a chamber, the bill must remain in the chamber for an 15additional 5 calendar days starting with the day the amendment 16is filed and adopted.